New Jersey, session 221, A5769.
Be It Enacted by the Senate and General Assembly of the State of New Jersey: 1.    This act shall be known and may be cited as the Ease of Doing Government Business Act. 2.    a.  Within 180 days of the effective date of P.L.    , c.    (C.        ) (pending before the Legislature as this bill), each State and local government entity that provide direct services to the public, including but not limited to, the issuance of licenses, clearances, permits, certifications, and authorizations, shall undertake a review of its operations and identify steps to streamline and expedite government transactions.  At least once each calendar year, the director, commissioner, or chief executive of each State and local government entity shall review all transactional services provided by the entity to determine the steps that can be taken to simplify, streamline, and expedite the delivery of government services by the entity, in a manner that increases efficiency and reduces the time it takes to complete government transactions.  The steps shall include, but may not be limited to, simplifying processes and procedures, reducing redundancies, eliminating waste, and increasing efficiency wherever possible, to the extent not inconsistent with the entitys obligations provided for by law. b.  Whenever feasible, each State and local government entity shall implement online resources, automated services, or any other technologies which may make the delivery of government services more efficient and responsive to the needs of the people of this State.  Any such resources, automated services, or technologies shall utilize plain language that is easily comprehendible, with clear and concise instructions to promote ease of use and, to the extent practicable, provide users with the option to select the language in which they would prefer those services to be delivered.  Wherever possible, mechanisms shall be provided to permit individuals to provide feedback to the government entity of their transaction experience and submit suggestions for improvement of the delivery of services.  Such feedback shall be reviewed by the government entity within 30 days of its submission and considered when adopting plans to increase efficiency of the delivery of services for future transactions. c.  As used in this section, State and local government entity means any offices, departments, and agencies of the Executive Branch of this State, and any commission, board, bureau, division, office, or instrumentality thereof, as well as any county, municipality, district, and any local commission, board, bureau, division, office, or instrumentality thereof. 3.    This act shall take effect immediately.